California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) Notwithstanding any other law, if an adult recipient reports and the county verifies, or the county otherwise discovers, that the recipient is meeting the federally required minimum average number of hours per week of welfare-to-work participation as set forth in Section 607 of Title 42 of the United States Code, that recipient shall be deemed to be in compliance with Section 11322.8, unless the recipient provides written or, if available, electronic notice to the county that the recipient wishes to have sanctions imposed
 pursuant to this article.

(b) Necessary supportive services shall be provided to recipients described in this section in accordance with Sections 11323.2 and 11323.4.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 740, Sec. 1.   (SB 1446)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.82.

(a) For the purpose of calculating the number of hours a recipient is participating in welfare-to-work activities pursuant to Section 11322.8, the number of hours for self-employment activities shall be based solely on the number of hours the recipient is engaged in self-employment activities, as authorized pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 11322.6.

(b) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of
 the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services shall implement and administer, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations. The department shall issue an all-county letter no later than October 1, 2022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 582, Sec. 1.   (AB 461)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.83.

(a) A recipient who is making satisfactory progress in a career pathway program established in accordance with the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128) shall be deemed to be in compliance with the hourly participation requirements described in subdivision (a) of Section 11322.8.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies only if a local workforce development board established under Section 3122 of Title 29 of the United States Code provides its approval that the career pathway program meets the requirements of Section 3102(7) of Title 29 of the United States Code and the county verifies that the recipient is making satisfactory progress in that program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 25, Sec. 10.   (AB 1603)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.84.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a person who satisfies the criteria in subdivision (b) shall be entitled to receive the standard payment for books and college supplies pursuant to Section 11323.21, subject to all of the following:

(1) The participant shall not be required to complete job club, as provided in Section 11325.22.

(2) The participant shall not be required to participate in orientation and appraisal, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 11320.1, more than once. A county may require another orientation and appraisal for participants who have had a break of more than one year in receiving aid or supportive services pursuant to this chapter.

(3) An assessment, as provided in Section 11325.4, shall be conducted only for the purpose of identifying any barriers, such as domestic violence, substance abuse, mental health, learning disability, or other barriers that the participant may have. This barrier assessment may be conducted only through a telephone or other electronic interview, unless the participant requests an in-person assessment in writing. In no event may that individual be disallowed to attend a publicly funded or nonprofit postsecondary education institution if otherwise eligible under this section due to any barrier.

(4) The participant shall not be required to participate in welfare-to-work activities pursuant to this article to satisfy instructional hours during semester or quarter breaks.

(b) (1) This section applies to both of the following:

(A) A recipient attending a publicly funded or nonprofit postsecondary educational institution full time and making
 satisfactory progress at that institution.

(B) A recipient attending a publicly funded or nonprofit postsecondary educational institution part time and who is meeting the hourly participation rates required by Section 11322.8, based on the number of instructional hours or academic units and the hours of study time required for those instructional hours or academic units. For purposes of calculating whether a recipient is meeting the hourly participation requirement, the number of hours for study time shall be three hours of study time for each instructional hour or academic unit. If a recipient’s instructional hours or academic units, in addition to the three hours of study time per unit, do not meet the total number of hours required by Section 11322.8, the county shall assist the recipient in meeting the required hours of
 participation by allowing the recipient to submit a proposal for meeting those hours based on the full array of options available to the recipient, which the county shall apply to satisfy the hourly participation requirement.

(2) A recipient described in this subdivision shall not be subject to Section 11322.85.

(c) A recipient who is attending a publicly funded or nonprofit postsecondary educational institution shall provide verification that they are making satisfactory progress at the beginning of each term when that information is available from the institution the recipient attends.

(d) For purposes of this section, the definitions of “full time,” “part time,” and “making satisfactory progress” shall be determined according
 to the rules and regulations of the publicly funded or nonprofit postsecondary educational institution that the individual attends.

(e) (1) An individual who meets the requirements of this section and wishes to receive supportive services shall be required to sign a welfare-to-work plan.

(2) The
 plan shall be mailed to the recipient for completion and shall be returned by mail or by electronic means, if the county has the capacity to make the plan electronically available. If the county requires the plan to be returned by mail, the county shall include a postage-prepaid envelope for that purpose. The recipient may request, in writing, to meet with a county employee to receive assistance with
 completing the plan.

(f) For purposes of this section, an “instructional hour” shall mean class time of 50 minutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 447, Sec. 1.   (SB 768)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.85.

(a) Unless otherwise exempt, an applicant or recipient shall participate in welfare-to-work activities.

(1) For 24 cumulative months during a recipient’s lifetime, these activities may include the activities listed in Section 11322.6 that are consistent with the assessment performed in accordance with Section 11325.4 and that are included in the individual’s welfare-to-work plan, as described in Section 11325.21, to meet the hours required in Section 11322.8. These 24 months need not be consecutive.

(2) Any month in which the recipient meets the requirements of Section 11322.8, through participation in an activity or activities described in paragraph (3), shall not count as a month of activities for
 purposes of the 24-month time limit described in paragraph (1).

(3) After a total of 24 months of participation in welfare-to-work activities pursuant to paragraph (1), an aided adult shall participate in one or more of the following welfare-to-work activities, in accordance with Section 607(c) and (d) of Title 42 of the United States Code as of the operative date of this section, that are consistent with the assessment performed in accordance with Section 11325.4, and included in the individual’s welfare-to-work plan, described in Section 11325.21:

(A) Unsubsidized employment.

(B) Subsidized private sector employment.

(C) Subsidized public sector employment.

(D) Work experience, including
 work associated with the refurbishing of publicly assisted housing, if sufficient private sector employment is not available.

(E) On-the-job training.

(F) Job search and job readiness assistance.

(G) Community service programs.

(H) Vocational educational training (not to exceed 12 months with respect to any individual).

(I) Job skills training directly related to employment.

(J) Education directly related to employment, in the case of a recipient who has not received a high school diploma or a certificate of high school equivalency.

(K) Satisfactory attendance
 at a secondary school or in a course of study leading to a certificate of general equivalence, in the case of a recipient who has not completed secondary school or received such a certificate.

(L) The provision of childcare services to an individual who is participating in a community service program.

(b) Any month in which any of the following conditions exists shall not be counted as one of the 24 months of participation allowed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a):

(1) The recipient is participating in job search in accordance with Section 11325.22, assessment pursuant to Section 11325.4, is in the process of appraisal as described in Section 11325.2, or is participating in the development of a welfare-to-work plan as described in Section 11325.21.

(2) The recipient is no longer receiving aid, pursuant to Sections 11327.4 and 11327.5.

(3) The recipient has been excused from participation for good cause, pursuant to Section 11320.3.

(4) The recipient is exempt from participation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(5) The recipient is only required to participate in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 11320.3.

(6) The recipient is participating in family stabilization pursuant to Section 11325.24, and the recipient would meet the criteria for good cause pursuant to Section 11320.3. This paragraph may apply to a recipient for no more than six cumulative months.

(c) County welfare departments shall provide each recipient who is subject to the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) written notice
 describing the 24-month time limitation described in that paragraph and the process by which recipients may claim exemptions from, and extensions to, those requirements.

(d) The notice described in subdivision (c) shall be provided at the time the individual applies for aid, during the recipient’s annual redetermination, and at least once after the individual has participated for a total of 18 months, and prior to the end of the 21st month, that count toward the 24-month time limit.

(e) The notice described in this section shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The number of remaining months the adult recipient may be eligible to receive aid.

(2) The requirements that the recipient must meet in accordance with paragraph
 (3) of subdivision (a) and the action that the county will take if the adult recipient does not meet those requirements.

(3) The manner in which the recipient may dispute the number of months counted toward the 24-month time limit.

(4) The opportunity for the recipient to modify their welfare-to-work plan to meet the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(5) The opportunity for an exemption to, or extension of, the 24-month time limitation.

(f) For an individual subject to the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), who is not exempt or granted an extension, and who does not meet those requirements, the provisions of Sections 11327.4, 11327.5, 11327.9, and 11328.2 shall apply to the extent consistent with the requirements of this section. For purposes of this section, the procedures referenced in this subdivision shall not be described as sanctions.

(g) (1) The department, in
 consultation with stakeholders, shall convene a workgroup to determine further details of the noticing and engagement requirements for the 24-month time limit, and shall instruct counties via an all-county letter, followed by regulations, no later than 18 months after the effective date of the act that added this section.

(2) The workgroup described in paragraph (1) may also make recommendations to refine or differentiate the procedures and due process requirements applicable to individuals as described in subdivision (f).

(h) (1) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) or any other law, an assistance unit that contains an eligible adult who has received assistance under this chapter, or from any state pursuant to the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program (Part A (commencing with Section 401) of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act
 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.)) prior to January 1, 2013, may continue in a welfare-to-work plan that meets the requirements of Section 11322.6 for a cumulative period of 24 months commencing January 1, 2013, unless or until the eligible adult exceeds the 48-month time limitation described in Section 11454.

(2) All months of assistance described in paragraph (1) prior to January 1, 2013, shall not be applied to the 24-month limitation described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(i) This section shall become inoperative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement the changes associated with the repeal of this section, whichever date is later, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 48.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Section operative January 1, 2014, by its own provisions.    Inoperative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.86.

(a) (1) Each county may provide an extension of time during which a recipient may participate in activities described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11322.85 for recipients who are unlikely to meet the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 11322.85 upon the expiration of the 24-month time limitation described in Section 11322.85.

(2) A county may grant extensions pursuant to paragraph (1) for a number of assistance units equal to no more than 20 percent of the assistance units in the county in which all adult members have been provided aid under this chapter for at least 24 months, in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11322.85, but not more than 48 months, in accordance with Section 11454.

(b) Counties are required to report information regarding the number and percentage of these extensions they have granted to the state.

(c) After consultation with stakeholders, the department shall issue an all-county letter by November 1, 2013, to define the process for implementing the extensions described in this section and the methodology for calculating the 20 percent limitation in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the state shall work with counties and other stakeholders to ensure that the extension process pursuant to subdivision (a) is implemented with minimal disruption to the impending completion of the welfare-to-work plans for recipients.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement the changes associated with the repeal of this section, whichever date is later, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 49.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Inoperative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.87.

(a) A recipient subject to the 24-month time limitation described in Section 11322.85 may request an extension in accordance with Section 11322.86 and may present evidence to the county that they meet any of the following circumstances:

(1) The recipient is likely to obtain employment within six months.

(2) The recipient has encountered unique labor market barriers temporarily preventing employment, and therefore needs additional time to obtain employment.

(3) The recipient has achieved satisfactory progress in an educational or treatment program, including adult basic education, vocational education, or a self-initiated program that has a known graduation, transfer, or completion date that would meaningfully increase the likelihood of the recipient’s employment. For purposes of this paragraph, a high school education or its equivalent is presumed to meaningfully increase the likelihood of employment.

(4) The recipient needs an additional period of time to complete a welfare-to-work activity specified in the recipient’s welfare-to-work case plan due to a diagnosed learning or other disability, so as to meaningfully increase the likelihood of the recipient’s employment.

(5) The recipient has submitted an application to receive SSI disability benefits, and a hearing date has been established.

(6) The recipient obtained the recipient’s high school diploma or its equivalent while participating in activities described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11322.85, and an additional period of time to complete an educational program or other activity described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11322.85 in which the recipient is currently participating would meaningfully increase the likelihood of the recipient’s employment.

(7) Other circumstances as determined by the department.

(b) (1) Except for an extension requested in accordance with paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), and subject to the limitation described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11322.86, a county shall grant an extension to a recipient who presents evidence in accordance with subdivision (a) unless the county determines that the evidence presented does not support the existence of the circumstances described in subdivision (a).

(2) An extension requested in accordance with paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) shall be granted if evidence
 that a hearing date has been established is provided to the county.

(3) At any hearing disputing a county’s denial of an extension in accordance with paragraph (1), the county shall have the burden of proof to establish that an extension was not justified unless the county demonstrates that the denial was due to the unavailability of an extension in accordance with the 20-percent limitation described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11322.86.

(c) If, as a result of information already available to a county, including the recipient’s welfare-to-work plan and verifications of participation, the county identifies that a recipient meets a circumstance described in subdivision (a), and subject to the limitation described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11322.86, a county may grant an extension of the 24-month time limitation described in paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (a) of Section 11322.85 to the recipient.

(d) An extension granted in accordance with subdivision (b) or (c) shall be granted for an initial period of up to six months and shall be reevaluated by the county at least every six months.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement the changes associated with the repeal of this section, whichever date is later, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 50.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Inoperative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.9.

(a) Community service activities shall meet all of the following criteria:

(1) Be performed in the public and private nonprofit sector.

(2) Provide participants with job skills that can lead to unsubsidized employment.

(3) Comply with the antidisplacement provisions contained in Section 11324.6.

(b) Participants in community service activities shall do all of the following:

(1) Participate in a community service activity for the number of hours required by Section 11322.8, unless fewer hours of community service participation are required by federal law.

(2) Participate in other work activities for the number of hours equal to the difference between the hours of participation in community service and the number of hours of participation required under Section 11322.8.

(c) The county plan pursuant to Section 10531 shall include a component, developed by the county in collaboration with local private sector employers, local education agencies, county welfare departments, organized labor, recipients of aid under this chapter, and government and
 community-based organizations providing job training and economic development, in order to identify all of the following:

(1) Unmet community needs that could be met through community service activities.

(2) The target population to be served.

(3) Entities responsible for project development, fiscal administration, and case management services.

(4) The terms of community service activities, that, to the extent feasible, shall be temporary and transitional, and not permanent.

(5) Supportive efforts, including job search, education, and training, which shall be provided to participants in community service activities.

(6) If
 the county intends to include grant-based on-the-job training in its community service plan, the process by which the county will comply with the voluntary consent form requirement established in subdivision (f) of Section 11322.6, including a list of the languages in which the consent form will be available.

(d) Aid under this chapter for any participant who fails to comply with the requirements of this section without good cause shall be reduced in accordance with Section 11327.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 229, Sec. 22.   Effective August 16, 2004.   Operative December 1, 2004, by Sec. 65 of Ch. 229.   Note: See Sec. 64.6 of Ch. 229 regarding implementation.)
-------------------------------------------

11323.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs) program serves the poorest families with children in the state by providing a basic needs cash grant and support services needed for family stabilization, employment, or job training. Childcare is a critical support service for CalWORKs families.

(b) Children in poverty are most in need of quality, stable early care and education to achieve their full potential. Research demonstrates the benefits of providing early care and education to ameliorate the effects of poverty and address inequities before achievement gaps widen.

(c) Families that are initially afforded the opportunity to participate in CalWORKs childcare are more likely to avoid sanction, and to be able to promptly participate in the necessary activities and progress toward economic stability, knowing that their children are in a safe, nurturing environment.

(d) While families may have access to other forms of childcare, in 2017, less than 30 percent of parents or other adult caretakers who were participating in the CalWORKs Welfare-to-Work Program and were responsible for the care of an eligible child were receiving Stage 1 childcare services.

(e) All Childcare and Development Services Act programs, except for CalWORKs
 childcare, have adopted
 24-month continuous eligibility rules pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 10271. Aligning CalWORKs childcare eligibility periods with all other childcare and development programs will benefit families, childcare providers, and the state and local agencies that administer the various childcare programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 356, Sec. 2.   (AB 1808)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11323.2.

(a) Necessary supportive services shall be offered and available to every participant to enable them to participate in a program activity or to accept or maintain employment. Necessary supportive services shall also be offered and available to every individual who is not required to participate, but chooses to participate voluntarily, to allow them to participate in a program activity or to accept or maintain employment. A participant who is required to participate and who does not receive necessary supportive services shall have good cause for not participating under subdivision (f) of Section 11320.3. Supportive services shall be listed in the welfare-to-work plan or other agreement entered into between the county and participant pursuant to this article, supportive services shall include all of the following:

(1) Childcare.

(A) Paid childcare shall be available to every participant with a dependent child in the household who needs paid childcare if the child is 12 years of age or under, or requires
 childcare or supervision due to a physical, mental, or developmental disability or other similar condition as verified by the county human services agency, or who is under court supervision. A county human services agency may verify the need for childcare or supervision for a child over 12 years of age from an individualized education plan or a
 statement from a qualified professional that the child is a child with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 10213.5. A sanctioned participant shall have access to childcare pursuant to this section if the participant has indicated an intent to engage in a program activity or employment, but has not yet participated.

(B) First-stage childcare, as described in Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8, shall be full time, unless the participant determines that part-time care better meets the family’s needs. Upon establishing
 initial or ongoing eligibility for first-stage childcare services under this chapter, a family shall be considered to meet all eligibility and need requirements and be authorized for not less than 24 months, or until the participant is transferred to the second stage of childcare. This shall apply to every participant who indicates a need for
 childcare in order to engage in a program activity or employment. A participant may, at any time, indicate a new or increased need for childcare and the information shall be used, as applicable, to authorize childcare in accordance with this subparagraph or increase the family’s services.

(C) Necessary
 childcare
 services shall be available to every former recipient for up to two years, pursuant to Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8. Beginning January 1, 2021, or the date that automation changes occur, as required for implementation, in the Statewide Automated Welfare System, whichever date is later, in the 18th month following the date of last receipt of aid, the county shall send a notice, via mail to the last known address, text message, or email, to a former recipient who is not currently receiving second- or third-stage childcare informing them that their eligibility for stage-two childcare will expire by the end of the 24th month following their last receipt of aid, and how to obtain stage-two childcare services. The department shall issue an all-county letter or similar directive by November 1, 2019, to implement this subparagraph, until regulations are adopted.

(D) A child in foster care receiving benefits
 under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.), or a child who would become a dependent child except for the receipt of federal Supplemental Security Income benefits pursuant to Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1381 et seq.), or a child who is not a member of the assistance unit but for whom the recipient is responsible for providing support, shall be deemed to be a dependent child for the purposes of this paragraph.

(E) The provision of care and payment rates under this paragraph shall be governed by Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8. Parent fees shall be governed by Sections 10271 and 10291.

(F) For purposes of subparagraphs (A) and (B), a participant includes an individual who is not required to participate, and expresses an intent to participate voluntarily, or a sanctioned participant who
 indicates an intent to engage in any program activity, as defined in subdivision (c), or employment. After securing
 childcare services, to document their commitment to participate, a participant shall sign a welfare-to-work plan or a curing plan, whichever is appropriate, or other agreement that may be developed and approved for use on a statewide basis by the department.

(2) Diaper costs.

(A) On and after April 1, 2018, a participant who is participating in a welfare-to-work plan shall be eligible for thirty dollars ($30) per month to assist with diaper costs for each child who is under 36 months of age.

(B) The department shall adopt regulations by January 1, 2020, to implement this paragraph. Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the
 department shall implement this paragraph through all-county letters until regulations are adopted.

(3) Transportation costs, which shall be governed by regional market rates as determined in accordance with regulations established by the department.

(4) Ancillary expenses, which shall include the cost of books, tools, clothing specifically required for the job, fees, and other necessary costs.

(5) Personal counseling. A participant who has personal or family problems that would affect the outcome of the welfare-to-work plan entered into pursuant to this article shall, to the extent available, receive necessary counseling and related supportive services, to help the participant and the participant’s family adjust to the participant’s job or training assignment.

(b) If provided in a county plan, the county may continue to provide case management and supportive services under this section to former participants who become employed. The county may provide these services for up to the first 12 months of employment to the extent they are not available from other sources and are needed for the individual to retain the employment.

(c) For the purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), “program activity” includes, but is not limited to, any welfare-to-work activity, orientation, appraisal, assessment, job search, job club, domestic violence services, court appearances, housing searches and classes, homeless support programs, shelter participation requirements, eviction proceedings, mental health services, including therapy or personal counseling, home visiting, drug and substance abuse services, parenting classes, and medical or education-related appointments for the participant or their
 dependents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 356, Sec. 3.   (AB 1808)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally superseded on or after July 1, 2026; See amendment by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11323.2.

(a) Necessary supportive services shall be offered and available to every participant to enable them to participate in a program activity or to accept or maintain employment. Necessary supportive services shall also be offered and available to every individual who is not required to participate, but chooses to participate voluntarily, to allow them to participate in a program activity or to accept or maintain employment. A participant who is required to participate and who does not receive necessary supportive services shall have good cause for not participating under subdivision (f) of Section 11320.3. Supportive services shall be listed in the welfare-to-work plan or other agreement entered into between the county and participant pursuant to this article, supportive services shall include all of the following:

(1) Childcare.

(A) Paid childcare shall be available to every participant with a dependent child in the household who needs paid childcare if the child is 12 years of age or under, or requires childcare or supervision due to a physical, mental, or developmental disability or other similar condition as verified by the county human services agency, or who is under court supervision. A county human services agency may verify the need for childcare or supervision for a child over 12 years of age from an individualized education plan or a statement from a qualified professional that the child is a child with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 10213.5. A sanctioned participant shall have access to childcare pursuant to this section if the participant has indicated an intent to engage in a program activity or employment, but has not yet participated.

(B) First-stage childcare, as described in Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8, shall be full time, unless the participant determines that part-time care better meets the family’s needs. Upon establishing initial or ongoing eligibility for first-stage childcare services under this chapter, a family shall be considered to meet all eligibility and need requirements and be authorized for not less than 24 months, or until the participant is transferred to the second stage of childcare. This shall apply to every participant who indicates a need for childcare in order to engage in a program activity or employment. A participant may, at any time, indicate a new or increased need for childcare and the information shall be used, as applicable, to authorize childcare in accordance with this subparagraph or increase the family’s services.

(C) Necessary childcare services
 shall be available to every former recipient for up to two years, pursuant to Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8. Beginning January 1, 2021, or the date that automation changes occur, as required for implementation, in the Statewide Automated Welfare System, whichever date is later, in the 18th month following the date of last receipt of aid, the county shall send a notice, via mail to the last known address, text message, or email, to a former recipient who is not currently receiving second- or third-stage childcare informing them that their eligibility for stage-two childcare will expire by the end of the 24th month following their last receipt of aid, and how to obtain stage-two childcare services. The department shall issue an all-county letter or similar directive by November 1, 2019, to implement this subparagraph, until regulations are adopted.

(D) A child in foster care receiving benefits under Title IV-E of the
 federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.), or a child who would become a dependent child except for the receipt of federal Supplemental Security Income benefits pursuant to Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1381 et seq.), or a child who is not a member of the assistance unit but for whom the recipient is responsible for providing support, shall be deemed to be a dependent child for the purposes of this paragraph.

(E) The provision of care and payment rates under this paragraph shall be governed by Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) of Part 1.8. Parent fees shall be governed by Sections 10271 and 10291.

(F) For purposes of subparagraphs (A) and (B), a participant includes an individual who is not required to participate, and expresses an intent to participate voluntarily, or a sanctioned participant who indicates an intent to engage
 in any program activity, as defined in subdivision (c), or employment. After securing childcare services, to document their commitment to participate, a participant shall sign a welfare-to-work plan or a curing plan, whichever is appropriate, or other agreement that may be developed and approved for use on a statewide basis by the department.

(2) Diaper costs.

(A) On and after April 1, 2018, a participant who is participating in a welfare-to-work plan shall be eligible for thirty dollars ($30) per month to assist with diaper costs for each child who is under 36 months of age.

(B) The department shall adopt regulations by January 1, 2020, to implement this paragraph. Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code), the department shall implement this paragraph through all-county letters until regulations are adopted.

(3) Transportation
 costs.

(A) Transportation services may include, but not be limited to, bus passes, mileage reimbursement, van pools, car repairs, car ownership programs, rideshare, parking, and tolls. Counties shall inform participants of the various transportation services available in the county and have the participant identify which transportation services they need in order to participate in welfare-to-work activities.

(B) When the county approves transportation costs for use of a private vehicle, the participant shall receive an advance payment for mileage, which shall be based on a mileage rate used in the county and in the county plan or a regional market rate that is updated annually. In addition, counties may opt to provide separate payments for specific
 necessary costs related to use of a private vehicle, including, but not limited to, gas, oil, insurance, license and registration fees, normal wear and tear, and maintenance, parking, tolls, car repairs, and other costs directly related to transportation and the activity.

(C) Transportation costs include payment for transporting a participant’s children when necessary for the participant to participate in their welfare-to-work assignment or activity.

(D) All payments for transportation shall be advanced to participants. At the time the welfare-to-work plan is developed and the participant’s activities are assigned, the county shall also determine what transportation services the participant needs, and shall issue the transportation payment based on the activities contained in the plan, prior to requiring the participant to participate in the activity.

(4) Ancillary expenses, which shall include the cost of books, tools, clothing specifically required for the job, fees, and other necessary costs.

(5) Personal counseling. A participant who has personal or family problems that would affect the outcome of the welfare-to-work plan entered into pursuant to this article shall, to the extent available, receive necessary counseling and related supportive services, to help the participant and the participant’s family adjust to the participant’s job or training assignment.

(b) If provided in a county plan, the county may continue to provide case management and supportive services under this section to former participants who become employed. The county may provide these services for up to the first 12 months of employment to the extent they are not available from other sources